District of Columbia statutes.
10-1431

Submission of development plan.

(a)

The development plan for property know as Heritage Island and a portion of Kingman Island (“Children’s Island”) in the Anacostia River in Ward 6, as shown on the plat filed in the Office of the Survey of the District of Columbia under S.O. 92-252, accompanied by a proposed resolution to approve the development plan, shall be submitted by the Mayor to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess.

(b)

If the Council does not approve or disapprove the development plan by resolution within this 45-day review period, the development plan shall be deemed approved by the Council.

(c)

The requirements of this section shall be in addition to all other requirements for approvals, permits, and procedures which are necessary to allow the development of Children’s Island.

History

Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-57, § 2, 40 DCR 7227